Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 20.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-120
Signing and filing pursuant to judicial
order.

(ULLCA
204) (a) If a person required by the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act to sign a record or deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing
under the act does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition
the district court to order:

(1) the person to sign
the record;

(2)
the person to deliver the record to the Secretary of State for filing; or

(3) the Secretary of
State to file the record unsigned.

(b) If a petitioner under subsection (a) of this section
is not the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company
to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the company a party
to the action.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 20.